Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-416.10
Applicability of sections.

Sections 44-416.05 to 44-416.10 apply to all cessions after September 4, 2005, under reinsurance agreements that have an inception, anniversary, or renewal date not less than six months after September 4, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 35.